Missouri, session 2026, HB1756.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 9.501, to read as follows:
9.501. The first full week in September each year is hereby designated as "June's
Week" and "Rare Pediatric Disease Week" in Missouri in honor of June, a young
Missourian undergoing treatment for an atypical teratoid rhabdoid tumor, subtype B
(ATRT-B). The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
and activities to raise public awareness of rare pediatric diseases, encourage early
recognition of symptoms, and honor Missouri children and families affected by rare
pediatric diseases.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.